Hawaii, session 2025, SB532.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that school health assistants may administer required medications to students.  However, due to increasing vacancies for school health assistants, many schools experience challenges in meeting the needs of students who are prescribed medications or may benefit from receiving medications in emergency situations while on campus.  This lapse of continued care may risk the health and safety of students who rely on timely administration of certain medications. To ensure the health and safety of students, other school staff who volunteer to administer medication can be effective substitutes once these individuals complete training and general instruction on medication administration.  Because skilled nursing services, such as those that require a license, are outside the scope even for school health assistants, requiring volunteers to complete training that includes correctly interpreting the health care provider's orders; identifying the correct route of administration, either oral, nasal, or topical; confirming the correct dose; administering medications at the right time of day; and documenting medication administration, can ensure accountability and the necessary safeguards for student health. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to authorize public school employees or agents who have completed appropriate training to administer medication for students consistent with standards applicable to school health assistants. SECTION 2.  Section 302A-853, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a)  School health assistants, and public school employees and agents trained by a health care professional employed or contracted by the department, may assist students by administering oral, nasal, and topical medication, and in emergency situations, other premeasured medication; provided that: (1)  If the student receiving the medication is a minor, a parent or guardian requests and authorizes the administration of medication; (2)  The medication has been prescribed by a [licensed] physician[, as defined in section 334-1, or by a practitioner] or physician assistant licensed pursuant to chapter 453, an advanced practice registered nurse with prescriptive authority[;] licensed pursuant to chapter 457, or by another licensed health care practitioner with prescriptive authority; (3)  The administration of the medication is with the approval of a health care professional within the department, department of health, or health care service as defined in section 323D-2 pursuant to a written agreement with the department; and (4)  The administration of the medication is necessary for the health of the student and for the student's attendance at school." SECTION 3.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.